Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB569.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for the payment of death benefits to the surviving spouse or children or parents of firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers, coroners or National Guard members who die as a result of the performance of their duties.Section 2. Section 1(a) introductory paragraph, (a.1) and (d) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding 1234567891011121314151617181920 a subsection to read:Section 1. (a) In the event a law enforcement officer, coroner, ambulance service or rescue squad member, firefighter, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or National Guard member dies as a result of the performance of his duties, an application, including a certification of death, shall be made to the department within three years of the date of such death by any of the following:* * *(a.1) A firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member, law enforcement officer, coroner, certified hazardous material response team member, member of the Pennsylvania Civil Air Patrol or National Guard member who suffers a fatal heart attack or stroke while on duty or not later than 24 hours after participating in a physical training exercise or responding to an emergency is presumed to have died as a result of the performance of his duties for purposes of this act.* * *(d) Upon receipt of such certification, the Commonwealth shall, from moneys payable out of the General Fund, pay to the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the minor children of the paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or coroner who died as a result of the performance of his duty the sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section and an amount equal to the monthly salary, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, of the deceased paid firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or coroner, less any workers' 20250HB0569PN0573 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compensation or pension or retirement benefits paid to such survivors, and shall continue such monthly payments until there is no eligible beneficiary to receive them. For the purpose of this subsection, the term "eligible beneficiary" means the surviving spouse or the child or children under the age of eighteen years or, if attending college, under the age of twenty-three years, of the firefighter, ambulance service or rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or coroner who died as a result of the performance of his duty. When no spouse or minor children survive, a single sum of $100,000, adjusted in accordance with subsection (f) of this section, shall be paid to the parent or parents of such firefighter, ambulance service member, rescue squad member [or], law enforcement officer or coroner.* * *(h) A coroner shall be deemed to be acting in the performance of his duties for the purposes of this act when acting in accordance with 16 Pa.C.S. Ch. 139 (relating to coroner).Section 3. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Coroner" means an elected or appointed coroner or deputy coroner or an elected or appointed medical examiner. * * *Section 4. Section 2.1 of the act is amended to read:Section 2.1. This act shall be broadly construed to grant 20250HB0569PN0573 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 benefits to firefighters, ambulance service or rescue squad members, law enforcement officers, coroners or National Guard personnel for deaths related to the performance of their duties.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0569PN0573 - 4 - 1234